South Dakota, session 2026, SB217.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $750,000 from the general fund, to the Department of Public
Safety, for a fire management officer position to support Division of Wildland Fire operations
east of the Missouri River.
Section 2. The secretary of the Department of Public Safety shall approve vouchers and the
state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized in this Act.
Section 3. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 4. This Act is effective beginning June 30, 2026.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.